Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB210.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2460YC (5) 91 cm/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 147.140, subsection 1, paragraphs a and 1 b, Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 2 a. In any action for personal injury or wrongful death 3 against a health care provider based upon the alleged 4 negligence in the practice of that profession or occupation or 5 in patient care, which includes a cause of action for which 6 expert testimony is necessary to establish a prima facie case, 7 the plaintiff shall, prior to the commencement of discovery in 8 the case and within sixty days of the defendantâs answer, serve 9 upon the defendant a certificate of merit affidavit affidavits 10 signed by an each expert witness with respect to the issue 11 all issues of standard of care , and an alleged breach of the 12 standard of care , and causation to be litigated in the action . 13 The Each expert witness must meet the qualifying standards of 14 section 147.139 . 15 b. A All certificate of merit affidavit affidavits must 16 be signed by the each expert witness and certify the purpose 17 purposes for calling the expert witness by providing under the 18 oath of the expert witness all of the following: 19 (1) The expert witnessâs statement of familiarity with the 20 applicable standard of care. 21 (2) The expert witnessâs statement that the standard of care 22 was breached by the health care provider named in the petition. 23 (3) The expert witnessâs statement that the breach caused 24 the personal injury or wrongful death. 25 Sec. 2. Section 147.140, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 26 following new subsection: 27 NEW SUBSECTION . 6A. A motion challenging whether a 28 certificate of merit was signed under oath shall be made no 29 later than sixty days from the date the certificate of merit 30 was filed. Any other motion challenging a certificate of merit 31 must be made no later than sixty days before trial. Once a 32 motion to challenge a certificate of merit is filed, a party 33 shall not withdraw and refile the certificate, except to 34 provide missing expert or notary signatures, nor shall a party 35 -1- LSB 2460YC (5) 91 cm/jh 1/ 2 H.F. _____ voluntarily dismiss the action and refile the certificate of 1 merit. 2